South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S845.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-11-1930(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) There is created a State Child Fatality Advisory Committee composed of: (1) the Director of the South Carolina Department of Social Services; (2) the Director of the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control Public Health; (3) the State Superintendent of Education; (4) the Executive Director of the South Carolina Criminal Justice Academy; (5) the Chief of the State Law Enforcement Division; (6) the Office Director of the Office of Substance Use Services; (7) the Office Director of the Office of Mental Health; (8) the Office Director of the Office of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities; (9) the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice; (10) the Chief Executive Officer of the Children's Trust of South Carolina; (11) the Executive Director of the South Carolina Commission for Community Advancement and Engagement; (12) the State Child Advocate; (13) a county coroner or medical examiner; (14) a solicitor; (11)(15) one senator to be appointed by the President of the Senate; (12)(16) one representative to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (13)(17) an attorney with experience in prosecuting crimes against children; (14) a county coroner or medical examiner; (15)(18) a board certified or eligible for board certification child abuse pediatrician, appointed from recommendations submitted by the State Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics; (16) a solicitor; (17)(19) a forensic pathologist; and (18)(20) two members of the public at large, one of whom shall represent a private nonprofit organization that advocates children services.;  and (19)the State Child Advocate. SECTION 2.  Section 63-11-1930(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) Those members in items (1)-(12)(16) shall serve ex officio and may appoint a designee to serve in their place from their particular departments or agencies who have administrative or program responsibilities for children and family services. The Governor shall appoint the remaining members, including the coroner or medical examiner and solicitor who shall serve ex officio for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Members may succeed themselves, but a member shall not serve on the committee in a holdover capacity at the conclusion of his term for more than one hundred eighty days. SECTION 3.  Section 63-11-1930(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D) The committee shall hold meetings at least quarterly. A majority of the committee who have been appointed and duly qualified, excluding the committee members in subsection (A)(11)(15) and (12)(16) or their designees, constitutes a quorum. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----